Utah statutes.
76-10-3103.   Definitions.

As used in this act:

(1)  "Attempt to monopolize" means action taken without a legitimate business purpose and with a specific intent of destroying competition or controlling prices to substantially lessen competition, or creating a monopoly, where there is a dangerous probability of creating a monopoly.

(2)  "Commodity" includes any product of the soil, any article of merchandise or trade or commerce, and any other kind of real or personal property.

(3)  "Manufacturer" means the producer or originator of any commodity or service.

(4)  "Service" includes any activity that is performed in whole or in part for the purpose of financial gain including, but not limited to, personal service, professional service, rental, leasing or licensing for use.

(5)  "Trade or commerce" includes all economic activity involving, or relating to, any commodity, service, or business activity, including the cost of exchange or transportation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

